Maryland, session 2025, HB0626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0626*

HOUSE BILL 626
12–207.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “MULTIPLE TENANT ENVIRONMENT” MEANS
COMMERCIAL OR RESIDENTIAL PREMISES THAT ARE OCCUPIED BY MULTIPLE
ENTITIES.
(2) “MULTIPLE TENANT ENVIRONMENT” INCLUDES A CENTRALLY
MANAGED RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE DEVELOPMENT.
(B) DURING THE NEW CONSTRUCTION OR MAJOR IMPROVEMENT,
INCLUDING ANY IMPROVEMENT OF ELECTRICAL INFRASTRUCTURE, OF A MULTIPLE
TENANT ENVIRONMENT, MICRO CONDUITS SHALL BE INSTALLED IN ANY UTILITY
EASEMENTS AND BUILDING POWER OR TELECOMMUNICATION ROOMS IN ORDER TO
ALLOW MULTIPLE BROADBAND SERVICE PROVIDERS TO PROVIDE BROADBAND
ACCESS TO THE MULTIPLE TENANT ENVIRONMENT.
Article – Transportation
8–654.1.
(A) A BURIED FIBER OPTIC CABLE INSTALLED IN A HIGHWAY
RIGHT–OF–WAY ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2025, SHALL INCLUDE CONDUIT
CONTAINING AT LEAST SEVEN MICRODUCTS.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT OR A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT:
(1) SHALL ENSURE THAT, ON REQUEST OF A BROADBAND SERVICE
PROVIDER, THE BROADBAND SERVICE PROVIDER HAS ACCESS TO THE CONDUIT
REQUIRED TO BE INSTALLED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION ON A
NEUTRAL AND NONDISCRIMINATORY BASIS; AND
(2) MAY CHARGE A BROADBAND SERVICE PROVIDER A REASONABLE
FEE FOR THE USE OF THE CONDUIT REQUIRED TO BE INSTALLED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.